Louisiana, session 2026, SB27.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:100.13(A), (D)(1) and (2), (E)(1), (F)(2)(e) and (f), (G)(2)(d), the
introductory paragraph of 100.13(I)(1), and the introductory paragraph of 100.13(I)(2) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§100.13. Expanded academic support
A. Each school year, each student in grades kindergarten through five eight
who failed to achieve mastery on any statewide assessment administered pursuant
to the state's school and district accountability system in reading, English language
arts, numeracy, or math in the previous academic year or performed below grade
level on a literacy or numeracy screener in the current academic year shall be
provided expanded academic support as provided in this Section.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-95 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 27
* * *
D. Each student identified in need of expanded academic support shall be
provided one of the following options:
(1) Prioritized placement in a class taught by a teacher labeled as "highly
effective" or "exemplary" pursuant to the state's teacher evaluation system, if a
highly effective such teacher is available in the school.
(2) High-dosage tutoring to commence no later than thirty days after the
student is identified in need of expanded academic support or, for students
identified through performance on state summative assessments, no later than
thirty days after the beginning of the school year.
E. High-dosage tutoring provided pursuant to this Section shall meet all of
the following criteria:
(1) Incorporate direct instruction by tutors using formative assessments
aligned with grade-level content and Tier 1 classroom instruction based on the
specific student needs that are prerequisite to accessing grade-level instruction.
* * *
F. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
* * *
(2) "High-quality instructional materials" means materials that meet all of the
following criteria:
* * *
(e) Are designed to devote the large majority of time to supporting the major
work of the grade or course.
(f) Help students in mathematics courses develop conceptual understanding,
procedural skill and fluency, and application or help students in reading or English
language arts courses develop word recognition skills, fluency to promote
automaticity, comprehension, and application of skills in literacy standards.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-95 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 27
G.
* * *
(2) In approving high-quality tutoring providers, the department shall require
the tutoring providers to:
* * *
(d) Use high-quality tutors who have passed background checks required of
school employees and completed foundational literacy or numeracy professional
learning courses appropriate to the subject for which support will be provided.
* * *
I.(1) Each city, parish, or other local public school board shall provide a
report by June first thirtieth of each year to the state Department of Education on
the following data regarding eligible and participating students:
* * *
(2) By July September first of each year, the department shall publish the
following report on its website:
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.